lexd_components/hyw-added_kogian.lexd
LEXICON NameNotGivenCountry
Արշակունիք:Արշակունիք
Բագրատունիք:Բագրատունիք
Ենէականք:Ենէականք
Հայաշա:Հայաշա
Հայկազեանք:Հայկազեանք
Ղեւոնդեանք:Ղեւոնդեանք
Մամիկոնեանք:Մամիկոնեանք
Մեծացուսցէ:Մեծացուսցէ
Շահնամակ:Շահնամակ
Վեդա:Վեդա
Մխիթարեանք:Մխիթարեանք
Վարդավառ:Վարդավառ

LEXICON InchRoot(2) #Class 19 ամչնալ and 20 նիհարնալ
հասկընալ:հասկը <tv>
աղքատնալ:աղքատ <iv>
ամըչնալ:ամըչ <iv>
արթըննալ:արթըն <iv>
բարդանալ:բարդա <iv>
երկըննալ:երկըն <iv>
թացնալ:թաց <iv>
թոյլնալ:թոյլ <iv>
լմըննալ:լմըն <iv>
ծոյլնալ:ծոյլ <iv>
ծուլնալ:ծուլ <iv>
կոյրնալ:կոյր <iv>
հինինալ:հինի <iv>
ռամկանալ:ռամկա <iv>

LEXICON VerbRootI(2)
ծնկիլ:ծնկ <tv>
ախոռժիլ:ախոռժ <iv>
անիրաւիլ:անիրաւ <iv>
երդուիլ:երդու <iv>
երկընչիլ:երկընչ <iv>
թրջոտիլ:թրջոտ <iv>
արգահատիլ:արգահատ <iv>
գործակցիլ:գործակց <iv>
դպչիլ:դպչ <iv>
թօշնիլ:թօշն <iv>
խնդակցիլ:խնդակց <iv>
խպնիլ:խպն <iv>
կռթնիլ:կռթն <iv>
հակառակիլ:հակառակ <iv>
հայիլ:հայ <iv>
հանդիպիլ:հանդիպ <iv>
հաւնիլ:հաւն <iv>
ճարակիլ:ճարակ <iv>
մաքառիլ:մաքառ <iv>
նախանձիլ:նախանձ <iv>
շրջշրջիլ:շրջշրջ <iv>
պաղատիլ:պաղատ <iv>
պտղիլ:պտղ <iv>
վարկանիլ:վարկան <iv>
վիճաբանիլ:վիճաբան <iv>
տքնիլ:տքն <iv>
փափագիլ:փափագ <iv>
քծնիլ:քծն <iv>
խորհիլ:խորհ <iv>
շահիլ:շահ <tv>
ուսանիլ:ուսան <iv>
խոստովանիլ:խոստովան <tv>
կարմրիլ:կարմր <tv>
ձգտիլ:ձգտ <tv>
հաղորդակցիլ:հաղորդակց <iv>
խմորիլ:խմոր <iv>
խռնիլ:խռն <iv>
ծթրիլ:ծթր <iv>
հասկըցուիլ:հասկըցու <iv>
ձախողիլ:ձախող <iv>
ճեղքիլ:ճեղք <iv>
պըտըտիլ:պըտըտ <iv>
սրարբիլ:սրարբ <iv>
վայթիլ:վայթ <iv>
քքուիլ:քքու <iv>

LEXICON VerbRootA(2)
անձկալ:անձկ <iv>
թռթռալ:թռթռ <iv>
հեծկըլտալ:հեծկըլտ <iv>
ճօճալ:ճօճ <iv>
փղձկալ:փղձկ <iv>
փռընգտալ:փռընգտ <iv>
սիգալ:սիգ <iv>
տզզալ:տզզ <iv>
գթալ:գթ <iv>
կսկծալ:կսկծ <iv>
ցնծալ:ցնծ <iv>
խաղալ:խաղ <iv>
տեղալ:տեղ <iv>
տենչալ:տենչ <iv>
մռմռալ:մռմռ <iv>
անսալ:անս <iv>
յուսալ:յուս <iv>
գուրգուրալ:գուրգուր <iv>
խղճալ:խղճ <iv>
խոկալ:խոկ <tv>
խտղտալ:խտղտ <tv>
հաւատալ:հաւատ <tv>
ողբալ:ողբ <iv>

LEXICON VerbRootE(2)
շաղփաղփել:շաղփաղփ <tv>
թոթովել:թոթով <tv>
մտածել:մտած <tv>
անկուշել:անկուշ <tv>
արտաշնչել:արտաշնչ <tv>
աքացել:աքաց <tv>
բամբասել:բամբաս <tv>
գրաւել:գրաւ <tv>
դարպասել:դարպաս <tv>
երեւակայել:երեւակայ <tv>
զառանցել:զառանց <tv>
թուել:թու <tv>
թրջել:թրջ <tv>
ժառանգել:ժառանգ <tv>
խաչակնքել:խաչակնք <tv>
խծպել:խծպ <tv>
հինել:հին <tv>
ձաղել:ձաղ <tv>
մակաբերել:մակաբեր <tv>
յարգել:յարգ <tv>
յիշել:յիշ <tv>
շարայարել:շարայար <tv>
շողոմել:շողոմ <tv>
սեպհականել:սեպհական <tv>
սոսորդել:սոսորդ <tv>
վայլել:վայլ <tv>
վայելել:վայել <tv>
վայլել:վայլ <tv>
վերյիշել:վերյիշ <tv>
տարաձայնել:տարաձայն <tv>
ցօղել:ցօղ <tv>
քուէարկել:քուէարկ <tv>
ակնածել:ակնած <iv>
ակնարկել:ակնարկ <iv>
աղօթել:աղօթ <iv>
առարկել:առարկ <iv>
բուրել:բուր <iv>
գեղգեղել:գեղգեղ <iv>
գիշերել:գիշեր <iv>
գոհաբանել:գոհաբան <iv>
դայլայլել:դայլայլ <iv>
դիմագրաւել:դիմագրաւ <iv>
դիմել:դիմ <iv>
երկնել:երկն <iv>
ըմբոշխնել:ըմբոշխն <iv>
ընդդիմաբանել:ընդդիմաբան <iv>
թեւակոխել:թեւակոխ <iv>
իշխել:իշխ <iv>
լռել:լռ <iv>
խարխափել:խարխափ <iv>
խնչել:խնչ <iv>
խուժել:խուժ <iv>
ծառայել:ծառայ <iv>
կանխել:կանխ <iv>
կատակել:կատակ <iv>
կաքաւել:կաքաւ <iv>
կեղծել:կեղծ <iv>
հակազդել:հակազդ <iv>
հակաճառել:հակաճառ <iv>
հակասել:հակաս <iv>
համապատասխանել:համապատասխան <iv>
հանդուրժել:հանդուրժ <iv>
հնարել:հնար <iv>
հոտոտել:հոտոտ <iv>
հսկել:հսկ <iv>
հրմշտկել:հրմշտկ <iv>
ձեռնարկել:ձեռնարկ <iv>
ճառել:ճառ <iv>
ճեպել:ճեպ <iv>
մլաւել:մլաւ <iv>
մորմոքել:մորմոք <iv>
յաճախել:յաճախ <iv>
նախագահել:նախագահ <iv>
նաւարկել:նաւարկ <iv>
նաւել:նաւ <iv>
նշանակել:նշանակ <iv>
նշկահել:նշկահ <iv>
նպաստել:նպաստ <iv>
շառաչել:շառաչ <iv>
շտապել:շտապ <iv>
պատասխանել:պատասխան <iv>
պատճառաբանել:պատճառաբան <iv>
պարել:պար <iv>
սակարկել:սակարկ <iv>
սեթեւեթել:սեթեւեթ <iv>
սիրաբանել:սիրաբան <iv>
սորել:սոր <iv>
տեւել:տեւ <iv>
տիրապետել:տիրապետ <iv>
տիրել:տիր <iv>
տնտեսել:տնտես <iv>
տուժել:տուժ <iv>
տրոփել:տրոփ <iv>
օձտել:օձտ <iv>
կոծել:կոծ <iv>
փչել:փչ <iv>
պտուտկել:պտուտկ <iv>
կշռել:կշռ <iv>
ողողել:ողող <iv>
կոխկրտել:կոխկրտ <tv>
վազվըզել:վազվըզ <iv>
խոցտել:խոցտ <iv>
շութափել:շութափ <iv>
սամսարել:սամսար <iv>
սպուժել:սպուժ <iv>
տարել:տար <iv>
կակղել:կակղ <tv>
տառադարձել:տառադարձ <tv>
խծկել:խծկ <tv>
մակրդել:մակրդ <tv>
խոճոճել:խոճոճ <tv>
կսմըթել:կսմըթ <tv>
յատել:յատ <tv>
հեղինակել:հեղինակ <tv>
ըստանձնել:ըստանձն <tv>
թողնել:թողն <tv>
փոքրել:փոքր <tv>
պըրպըտել:պըրպըտ <tv>
թրջոտել:թրջոտ <tv>
ճմռթքել:ճմռթք <tv>
նախահաստատել:նախահաստատ <tv>
ձեւաւորել:ձեւաւոր <tv>

LEXICON CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa
արթընցընել:արթըն
երկընցընել:երկըն
լմընցընել:լմըն
հասկըցընել:հասկը
յեցընել:յե
